Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202585-2609
Act, how cited.

Sections 85-2609 to 85-2625 shall be known and may be cited as the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act.

Laws 2016, LB906, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 107;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 97;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 85-2601;

Laws 2025, LB608, § 2.